Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 15-24, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 15-24. A. The executive board shall:
1. Make an estimate of the cost of the free district fair;


ENGR. H. B. NO. 1547 Page 1

2. Apportion to each of the counties comprising the association
the portion to be borne by each member county together with the plan
and items of expenditures; and
3. Certify the estimate to the county excise board in each of
the member counties in time to be acted on by the county excise
board at its annual meeting for making tax levies.
B. The items to be considered in the expenditure of funds shall
be for:
1. Premiums on livestock, poultry, fruit, agriculture,
horticultural and dairy products; boys' and girls' club work, school
exhibits, culinary products, textile products, needlework and
sewing, hand painting, decorating and drawing, and cultivated plants
and flowers;
2. The necessary expenses of management of free district fairs
organized under the provisions of this article, including office
expense, postage, telegraph and telephone, digital and electronic
communication, Internet and supporting equipment, traveling expenses
of secretary within the district in which the fair is held, printing
(except premium lists) and necessary office supplies, premium
ribbons and badges, clerical help, guards, superintendents and
judges; and
3. Advertising the fair and for decorating and cleaning the
grounds and buildings, and for caring for the grounds during the
fair.
ENGR. H. B. NO. 1547 Page 2

SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 15-55, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 15-55. A. As soon as practicable, prior to July first,
after the election of members of the county fair association, the
members elect shall meet at the county seat and shall perfect an
organization by the election of a president, vice president,
secretary and a board of directors. The members elect shall
designate a day where they shall have a twelve-hour window to vote
for the election of a president, vice president, secretary, and
board of directors. The Board of Directors shall consist of the
president, vice president, secretary and four members, and such
committees and officers as shall be deemed necessary. The secretary
may be selected outside of the association, but must be a resident
of the county seat or the town or city where the county fair is
held.
B. The president, vice president, secretary, or any member of
the board of directors may be removed from their position for
failure to attend at least fifty percent (50%) of meetings in a
calendar year. The president, vice president, secretary, and
members of the board of directors may be removed from their
positions by a unanimous vote of all other members.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 15-58, is
amended to read as follows:

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1547 Page 3

Section 15-58. A. The executive board, with such committee as
may be selected from the county fair association, shall make an
estimate of the cost of the township and county fairs, and shall
certify such estimate to the county excise board in time to be acted
upon by the county excise board at its annual meeting for making tax
levies.
B. The items to be considered in the expenditure of funds shall
be for:
1. Premiums on livestock, poultry, agricultural and
horticultural products, dairy products, boys' and girls' club work,
products of domestic science and domestic arts, school exhibits,
hand painting, decorating and drawing, manufactured articles,
cultivated plants and flowers;
2. Necessary expenses of management of township and county
fairs organized under the provisions of this article, including
office expenses, postage, telegraph and telephone, digital and
electronic communication, Internet and supporting equipment, salary
and traveling expenses of the secretary, printing and necessary
office supplies, premium ribbons and badges, clerical help, guards,
superintendents and judges;
3. Advertising the fairs and for decorating and cleaning the
grounds and buildings, and for caring for the grounds and buildings;
and

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1547 Page 4

4. Transportation and arrangement of township fair exhibits at
the county fair and county fair exhibits at the Oklahoma State Fair
and other State Fairs.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 15-70, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 15-70. A. The county commissioners, the county excise
board and all other proper officers of the county may make an annual
levy upon all taxable property in the county in an amount not to
exceed one-half (1/2) of one (1) mill per annum in counties of more
than fifteen thousand (15,000) population. In counties of less than
fifteen thousand (15,000) population, the proper officers of the
county may make an annual levy upon all taxable property in the
county of not exceeding one (1) mill per annum. The purpose of the
levy is to raise funds for:
1. The support and maintenance of the fair, including the
payment of premiums on livestock, poultry, agricultural and
horticultural products, dairy products, boys' and girls' club work
or other junior agricultural organizations which shall be in one
class, products of domestic science and domestic arts, farm women's
clubs, hand paintings, cultivated plants and flowers;
2. Necessary expenses of management of said fair, including
office expenses, postage, telegraph and telephone, digital and
electronic communication, Internet and supporting equipment, salary

ENGR. H. B. NO. 1547 Page 5

and traveling expenses of the secretary, printing and necessary
office supplies;
3. Premium ribbons and badges, clerical help, guards,
superintendents and judges;
4. Advertising, decorating and cleaning the grounds and
buildings; and
5. The repair of or erecting buildings owned and controlled by
said county that are or will be used for free fair purposes.
B. In the counties of this state having a population in excess
of fifty-five thousand (55,000), according to the 1940 Federal
Decennial Census and in which county there is not authorized a state
fair, it shall be the mandatory duty of the county commissioners and
the excise board and other officers of the county, to make annual
levy for the purposes specified by this section upon all taxable
property in such county of not less than one-fourth (1/4) of one (1)
mill per annum.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.







ENGR. H. B. NO. 1547 Page 6

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ______ day of ________, 2025.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 1547 Page 7